Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2236.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Appropriation; Navajo county community college district; Northland Pioneer community college; report; exemption A. The sum of $4,300,000 is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to Navajo county community college district for capital improvements to the northeast Arizona training center that is operated and controlled by Northland Pioneer community college. B. The monies appropriated in subsection A of this section shall be used only for public safety workforce training purposes, including: 1. Refurbishment and modernization of the instructional driving track to comply with the training standards adopted by the Arizona peace officer standards and training board pursuant to title 41, chapter 12, article 8, Arizona Revised Statutes. 2. Expansion and renovation of classroom instructional space necessary to increase enrollment in public safety and emergency services training programs. 3. Infrastructure improvements directly related to law enforcement, firefighting and emergency services instruction, including safety, regulatory compliance and instructional effectiveness. C. On or before December 31, 2027, the Navajo county community college district shall submit a report to the governor, the president of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives and provide a copy of this report to the secretary of state describing: 1. Expenditures made pursuant to subsection B of this section. 2. Progress toward compliance with training standards set by the Arizona peace officer standards and training board. 3. Classroom capacity and infrastructure improvements that have been completed. 4. Enrollment, graduation and workforce outcomes. D. The appropriation made in subsection A of this section is exempt from the provisions of section 35-190, Arizona Revised Statutes, relating to lapsing of appropriations.